Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska63-101
Newspapers, magazines, periodicals; recipient, when not liable for subscription price.

No person in this state shall be compelled to pay for any newspaper, magazine or other publication which shall be mailed or sent to him without his having subscribed for or ordered it, or which shall be mailed or sent to him after the time of his subscription or order therefor has expired, notwithstanding that he may have received it.

Laws 1905, c. 104, § 1, p. 500;

R.S.1913, § 5514;

C.S.1922, § 4810;

C.S.1929, § 63-101;

R.S.1943, § 63-101.